Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-909
Organization; territory.

A majority of the resident taxpayers in any compact and contiguous district, territory, neighborhood, or community in the State of Nebraska, which is equivalent in area to one township or more, is hereby authorized to form, organize, and establish a cemetery district which shall be empowered to equip and maintain a cemetery or cemeteries when the organization thereof is completed.

Laws 1961, c. 27, § 1, p. 138;

Laws 1961, c. 28, § 1, p. 143.